Utah statutes.
17D-1-502.   General obligation bonds.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), if a special service district
intends to issue general obligation bonds, the special service district shall
first obtain the approval of special service district voters for issuance of
the bonds at an election held for that purpose as provided in Title 11,
Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act.
(2)  General obligation bonds shall be secured by a pledge of the full faith
and credit of the special service district.
(3)  A special service district may issue refunding general obligation bonds,
as provided in Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act, without
obtaining voter approval.
(4) (a)  A special service district may not issue general obligation bonds if
the issuance of the bonds will cause the outstanding principal amount of all
of the special service district's general obligation bonds to exceed the
amount that results from multiplying the fair market value of the taxable
property within the special service district, as determined under Subsection
11-14-301(3)(b), by .12.
(b)  Bonds or other obligations of a special service district that are not
general obligation bonds are not included in the limit stated in Subsection
(4)(a).
(5)  A special service district may not be considered to be a municipal
corporation for purposes of the debt limitation of the Utah Constitution
Article XIV, Section 4.
(6)  Bonds issued by an administrative or legal entity created under Title 11,
Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, may not be considered to be bonds of a
special service district that participates in the agreement creating the
administrative or legal entity.
